Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. Gasoline Tax

§ 39-17-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Agricultural purposes” means the cultivation of soil, raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity including the raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, grazing, training and management of livestock, bees, poultry, furbearing animals and wildlife for gain, sale or profit, but excluding a custom operation;

“Bulk gasoline” means thirty-five (35) gallons or more purchased and delivered at one (1) time, excluding gasoline delivered into the attached gasoline tanks or auxiliary tanks of a licensed motor vehicle;

“Bulk plant” means a fuel storage and distribution facility, other than a terminal, from which accountable product may be removed at a rack;

“Custom operation” means any agricultural purpose done for hire;

“Dealer” means any person who sells or offers to sell gasoline at a specific location in the state, including any person selling or offering to sell aviation gasoline or aviation fuel at Wyoming airports;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Distributor” means any person, other than a dealer, who receives gasoline or blends fuel for distribution or resale in this state;

Repealed by Laws, 2007, ch. 11, § 2.

“Export” means to obtain gasoline in this state for sale or other distribution in another state. Gasoline delivered out of the state of Wyoming by, or for, the purchaser constitutes an export by the purchaser;

“Exporter” means a person, other than a supplier who purchases gasoline in this state for the purpose of transporting or delivering, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, the gasoline to another jurisdiction;

“Gasohol” means an accountable product resulting from a blend of gasoline and ethanol. The term gasohol is included in the term gasoline;

“Gasoline” means the volatile substance produced from petroleum, natural gas, oil, shale or coal, sold under the name of gasoline and such other volatile and inflammable liquids, produced, manufactured, blended or compounded which can be used for operating or propelling motor vehicles, including all products having an initial boiling point of one hundred seventy (170) degrees Fahrenheit or less and including all products having an initial boiling point of more than one hundred seventy (170) degrees Fahrenheit of which ninety-five percent (95%) or more can be evaporated at or below four hundred sixty-four (464) degrees Fahrenheit except stove oil, furnace fuel, tractor fuel, diesel fuel, distillate, naphtha, kerosene and other products that do not come within the specification for gasoline, but shall include such other volatile and inflammable liquids produced, manufactured, blended or compounded which can be used for operating or propelling aircraft;

“Import” means to bring gasoline into this state by any means of conveyance other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle. Gasoline delivered into this state from out of state by or for the seller constitutes an import by the seller, and gasoline delivered by or for the purchaser constitutes an import for the purchaser;

“Importer” means a person, other than a supplier, who purchases gasoline out of this state for the purpose of transporting or delivering, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, the gasoline into this state for sale, use or distribution within this state;

“Position holder” means with respect to gasoline in a terminal, the person who holds the inventory position in the gasoline as reflected on the records of the terminal operator. A person holds the inventory position when that person has a contractual agreement with the terminal operator for use of the storage facilities or other terminal related services at a terminal with respect to gasoline. The term also includes a terminal operator who owns gasoline in a terminal;

“Rack” means a mechanism for delivering gasoline from a refinery or terminal into a transport truck, railroad car or other means of transfer that is outside of the terminal transfer system;

“Refiner” means any person who produces, refines, manufactures, blends or compounds gasoline in this state for use, sale or distribution;

“Supplier” means a person that is:

Subject to the general taxing jurisdiction of this state;

Registered pursuant to section 4101 of the federal Internal Revenue Code for transactions in motor fuels in the bulk transfer/terminal distribution system; and

One (1) of the following:

The position holder in a terminal or refinery in this state;

An importer of motor fuel into this state from another jurisdiction;

A person who acquires motor fuel from a terminal or refinery from a position holder pursuant to a two-party exchange; or

The position holder in a terminal or refinery outside this state with respect to motor fuel which that person imports into this state on the account of that person.

“Supplier” also means a person that produces alcohol or alcohol derivative substances in this state, produces alcohol or alcohol derivative substances for import to this state into a terminal, or acquires upon import by truck or railcar into a terminal or refinery, alcohol or alcohol derivative substances.

“Terminal” means a gasoline storage and distribution facility that is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which gasoline may be removed at a rack;

“Terminal operator” means any person who owns, operates or otherwise controls a terminal;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Billed gallons” means the gallons billed to the customer;

“Accountable product” means any product that is subject to the reporting requirements of this state, regardless of its intended use or taxability;

“Alternative fuel” means as defined in W.S. 39-17-301(a)(iii);

“Common carrier” means a person, including a railroad operator, who transports accountable product and who does not own the product;

“Gallon” means gallon as measured on a gross basis as defined in this section;

“Gross gallon” means a measured gallon without temperature or barometric adjustments.

As used in this chapter, “motor fuels” means gasoline as defined in paragraph (a)(xii) of this section and diesel fuel as defined in W.S. 39-17-201(a)(xxi).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; 1999, ch. 14, § 1; 2001, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 99, § 1; 2013 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 28, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), added (xxiii)-(xxvii), rewrote the definition of “‘Bulk plant’” in (iii), rewrote the definition of “‘Gasohol’” in (xi), in (xii), deleted “jet fuel which is the volatile substance produced from petroleum, natural gas, oil, shale or coal and sold under the name of jet fuel and” following “shall include,” deleted “propane” following “ethane,” and repealed former (viii), which read: “Ethanol based motor fuel” means a blend of ninety percent (90%) gasoline and ten percent (10%) ethanol used for operating or propelling motor vehicles. The term ethanol based motor fuel is included in the term gasoline.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(i), deleted the former last sentence which read: “No person shall be granted an agricultural credit under W.S. 39-17-105(c) unless that person had gross revenues from agricultural products including the furnishing of pasture, forage, care or management of livestock averaging not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) during the preceding two (2) calendar years.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “Gasoline does not mean methane, ethane, butane or liquefied gas” after “propelling aircraft” at the end of (a)(xii).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a)(xxiv).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(xxi), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

39-17-101

through W.S.

39-17-111

."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S.

39-6-201

, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments by ch. 51 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-17-102.
Administration; confidentiality.

The administration of this article is vested in the department which shall prescribe the reporting format and forms for the making of returns, and assessment and collection of license taxes and fees hereby imposed. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the provisions hereof as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act necessary to the enforcement of the provisions of this article. All tax returns and records are open to examination by the director of the state department of audit or his deputies.

No state employee who by virtue of his employment has knowledge of the business affairs of any person filing or required to file any tax returns under this article shall make known its contents in any manner or permit any person to have access to any returns or information contained therein except as provided by law or in the following cases:

The delivery to the taxpayer or his legal representatives upon written request of a copy of any return or report in connection with his tax;

The publication of statistics so classified to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports;

The inspection by the attorney general of the report or return of any person who brings an action against the state, or against whom an action is contemplated or has been instituted;

The introduction into evidence of any report or return or information therefrom in any administrative or court proceeding to which the person making the report or return is a party;

The furnishing of any information to the United States government and its territories, the District of Columbia, any state allowing similar privileges to the department or to the multistate tax commission for relay to tax officials of cooperating states. Information furnished shall be only for tax purposes;

The inspection of tax returns and records by the department of audit.

Any person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “reporting format and” in (a).

§ 39-17-103.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

There is levied and shall be collected a license tax on all gasoline used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state except for those fuels exempted under W.S.

39-17-105

;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 46 § 2.

Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

The state of Wyoming preempts the field of imposing taxes upon sales of gasoline and no city, town or county may levy or collect taxes upon the sales of gasoline;

The taxes imposed on motor fuel shall be conclusively presumed to be a direct tax on the ultimate or retail consumer. When taxes are paid by any person other than the ultimate or retail consumer, the payment shall be considered as precollected and as an advance payment of the purpose of convenience and facility to the consumer and shall thereafter be added to the price of the motor fuel and recovered from the ultimate or retail consumer, regardless of where or how the taxable fuel is ultimately consumed.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

Every person who sells or offers to sell to the retail trade gasoline for use in motor vehicles shall conspicuously display a sign stating the price per gallon including all applicable taxes. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to key lock or card lock fuel dispensing systems;

Every person who sells or offers to sell to the retail trade gasoline blended with alcohol or ethers for use in motor vehicles shall conspicuously display a sign on each pump dispensing the fuel stating the blend of gasoline and alcohol or ethers;

A terminal operator or bulk plant operator may rely on the representation made by the purchaser of motor fuel or the purchaser’s agent concerning the destination state of the motor fuel. A purchaser is liable for any tax due as a result of the purchaser’s diversion of fuel from the represented destination state;

The taxes imposed on motor fuel shall be conclusively presumed to be a direct tax on the ultimate or retail consumer. When taxes are paid by any person other than the ultimate or retail consumer, the payment shall be considered as precollected and as an advance payment of the purpose of convenience and facility to the consumer and shall thereafter be added to the price of the motor fuel and recovered from the ultimate or retail consumer, regardless of where or how the taxable fuel is ultimately consumed.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2000, ch. 8, § 1; 2003, ch. 15, § 1; 2007, ch. 88, § 2; 2015 ch. 46, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(ii) substituted “exceeds seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000.00)” for “exceeds ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00)”, and substituted “eleven million dollars ($11,000,000.00)” for “four million dollars ($4,000,000.00).”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, repealed former (a)(ii), pertaining to suspension of collection of fuel taxes as specified.

Interstate commerce not unconstitutionally burdened. —

Gasoline tax applies to gasoline imported for use in interstate airplanes, upon its withdrawal from storage tanks, and is not an unconstitutional burden on interstate commerce in such a case. Edelman v. Boeing Air Transport, Inc., 289 U.S. 249, 53 S. Ct. 591, 77 L. Ed. 1155, 1933 U.S. LEXIS 177 (U.S. 1933).

Sales of gasoline within confines of Yellowstone national park. —

Yellowstone national park boundaries were obliterated by federal Hayden-Cartwright Act (4 USCS § 104) so far as motor fuel sales were concerned when such sales were not made for exclusive use of United States, and such sales were, for tax purposes, had within state of Texas Co. v. Siefried, 60 Wyo. 142, 147 P.2d 837,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 60 Wyo. 174, 150 P.2d 99 (Wyo. 1944).

Where consignee's employees prepared sales invoices in Yellowstone park, upon delivery of gasoline there, employees making sales and trucks transporting gasoline were located in park when sales were made, within federal Hayden-Cartwright Act (4 USCS § 104), making sales subject to state tax. Texas Co. v. Siefried, 60 Wyo. 142, 147 P.2d 837,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 60 Wyo. 174, 150 P.2d 99 (Wyo. 1944).

Applied

in

United States v. Kabeiseman, 970 F.2d 739, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 16541 (10th Cir. 1992).

Cited

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. Wyoming, Dep't of Environment Quality, 902 F.2d 1482, 1990 U.S. App. LEXIS 6710 (10th Cir. 1990).

§ 39-17-104.
Taxation rate.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and W.S.

39-17-105

, the total tax on gasoline shall be twenty-four cents ($.24) per gallon. The rate shall be imposed as follows:

There is levied and shall be collected a license tax of twenty-three cents ($.23) per gallon on all gasoline used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state except for those fuels exempted under W.S.

39-17-105

;

Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of this subsection, gasoline sold for use in aircraft shall be taxed at four cents ($.04) per gallon except for those fuels exempted under W.S. 39-17-105;

In addition to the tax collected pursuant to paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, there is levied and shall be collected a license tax of one cent ($.01) per gallon on all gasoline used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state except for those fuels exempted under W.S. 39-17-105(a).

Amended and renumbered as (a)(ii) by Laws 2003, ch. 15, § 1.

Amended and renumbered as (a)(iii) by Laws 2003, ch. 15, § 1.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 15, § 2.

Repealed Laws 2015, ch. 28, § 3.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 64, § 1; 2003, ch. 15, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 28, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “twenty-four cents ($.24)” for “fourteen cents ($.14)” following “gasoline shall be” in the introductory paragraph in (a); and substituted “twenty-three cents ($.23)” for “thirteen cents ($.13)” following “license tax of” in (a)(i).

The 2014 amendment

added (e).

Laws 2014, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, repealed (e), which specified gasoline gallon equivalents for nonliquefied compressed natural gas.

Editor's notes. —

Subsection (d) of this section was originally designated as subsection (a) of W.S. 39-6-217, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 1998, and was subsequently redesignated by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office, pursuant to W.S.

8-1-105

.

Laws 1998, ch. 108, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended subsection (a) of W.S. 39-6-209, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-209(a) by ch. 51 was subsequently incorporated into subsection (a) of this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 2013, ch. 49, § 2, directs:
“(a) Until June 30, 2014, any funds deposited
to the highway fund
which are attributable to the increase in fuel
taxes under this act
shall be separately accounted for by the department
of transportation
and shall only be expended to:

“(i) Maintain
the state highway system in the condition existing
as of the effective
date of this act; and

“(ii) Prepare
the report required by subsection (c) of this section.

“(b) Any funds
deposited to the highway fund which are attributable
to the increase
in fuel taxes under this act shall supplement and
shall not supplant
funds currently budgeted by the transportation
commission for purposes
of maintaining the state highway system in
the 2013-2014 fiscal biennium.

“(c) The department
of transportation shall provide a comprehensive
report to the joint
appropriations interim committee and joint transportation,
highways
and military affairs interim committee on or before November
1, 2013
on the condition of the state highway system and projected
revenue
requirements to maintain the current condition of the state
highway
system.”

Refund of LUST tax. —

Laws 2001, ch. 129, § 2, effective July 1, 2001, provides that all severance taxes distributed under title 39, chapter 14, to the corrective action account created by §

35-11-1424

and the financial responsibility account created by §

35-11-1427

are to be in the amount of fuel taxes collected under § 39-17-104(c), (§ 39-17-104(a)(iii)) and § 39-17-204(b), (§ 39-17-204(a)(ii)) less any refunds.

Interstate commerce not unconstitutionally burdened. —

Gasoline tax applies to gasoline imported for use in interstate airplanes, upon its withdrawal from storage tanks, and is not an unconstitutional burden on interstate commerce in such a case. Edelman v. Boeing Air Transport, Inc., 289 U.S. 249, 53 S. Ct. 591, 77 L. Ed. 1155, 1933 U.S. LEXIS 177 (U.S. 1933).

§ 39-17-105.
Exemptions.

Gasoline sold at a Wyoming terminal rack for export, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, by a person licensed as an exporter in this state is exempt from the license tax imposed under W.S. 39-17-104(a)(i) through (iii). The exempt sales shall be reported on or before the last day of the month in a format required by the department. The sales reports are invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of sale. Gasoline directly exported, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, by a Wyoming licensed supplier, is exempt from the additional license tax imposed under W.S. 39-17-104(a)(iii). Exchanges and sales of gasoline between suppliers are exempt from the license tax under this section.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 99, § 2.

Exchanges or sales of gasoline between suppliers are exempt from the license tax under this article. Gasoline directly exported, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, by a supplier is exempt from the license tax under this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 15, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, § 1; 2011, ch. 99, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), deleted “exported or” following “Gasoline,” substituted “for export” for “and directly exported outside the state” in the first sentence, deleted “business” following “before the last,” and substituted “in a format required” for “on forms provided” in the second sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (c), which read: “There is granted a credit to the purchaser and user of gasoline used for agricultural purposes and purchased from a Wyoming licensed distributor or importer an amount equal to seventy percent (70%) of the gasoline license taxes imposed by W.S. 39-17-104(a)(i) and (ii) on bulk gasoline purchased for agricultural purposes. A Wyoming licensed distributor or importer shall collect the gasoline license tax on bulk gasoline sales less the amount of the credit granted under this section at the time of invoice on the bulk gasoline.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, §§ 2 and 3, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-209, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. Some of the amendments to § 39-6-209 by ch. 51 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, amended subsection (a) of W.S. 39-6-211, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments by ch. 51 to § 39-6-211(a) were subsequently incorporated into subsection (c) of this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, amended subsection (a) of W.S. 39-6-215, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. Some of the amendments by ch. 51 to § 39-6-215(a) were subsequently incorporated into subsection (a) of this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Exemptions strictly construed. —

Enactments providing for the exemption of certain motor fuel from operation of gasoline taxation statute are to be strictly construed. Texas Co. v. Siefried, 60 Wyo. 142, 147 P.2d 837,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 60 Wyo. 174, 150 P.2d 99 (Wyo. 1944).

§ 39-17-106.
Licenses; permits.

Every supplier, refiner, distributor, terminal operator, importer or exporter of gasoline shall annually obtain from the department a license to conduct business in the state. Before beginning business as a supplier, distributor, terminal operator, importer, exporter or refiner, a person shall file an application with the department on forms prescribed and furnished by the department containing the information specified therein. The fee for each license is twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The department may revoke any license granted upon proof of violation of any provision of this article.

Every dealer shall annually obtain from the department a license to conduct business in the state. Before beginning business as a dealer, a person shall file an application with the department on forms prescribed and furnished by the department containing the information specified therein. The application for the license shall state the location of each place where gasoline is to be sold or offered for sale. The license shall be used only for one (1) specific location by the dealer in whose name it is issued. The license is valid for one (1) year or unless surrendered by the dealer for nonuse or revoked by the department. The dealer shall immediately return the license upon the sale or discontinuance of any licensed location. The license fee is twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each location. The department may revoke any license granted upon proof of violation of the provisions of this article.

Every person who supplies ethanol in this state, who imports ethanol into this state, or who exports ethanol from this state, shall annually obtain from the department a license to conduct business in this state. Before beginning business as a supplier, importer or exporter of ethanol, a person shall file an application with the department on forms prescribed and furnished by the department containing the information specified therein. The fee for each license is twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The department may revoke any license granted upon proof of violation of the provisions of this article or a violation of any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article.

The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other jurisdictions for the licensing of persons under this act who have been licensed under a similar law in another jurisdiction.

The department may require bonds, or accept in lieu of a bond a certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of paragraph (vi) of this subsection, under this article as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all licensees shall file with the department a bond in the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), or the equivalent of the licensee’s tax liability for six (6) months, whichever is greater, at the discretion of the department. The department shall waive the bond if a licensee has established a good filing record which is complete, accurate and timely with the department for the preceding three (3) years;

When a distributor who has been in business for three (3) years or longer and has established a good filing record which is complete, accurate and timely with the department violates a provision of this article, the distributor shall file a bond with the department equal to the sum of the last available six (6) months tax liability;

The bond shall be executed with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business in this state. In lieu of a corporate surety bond, the department may accept a cash bond made payable to the department. Any interest earned on a cash bond shall accrue to the licensee. The bond shall be:

Approved as to form by the Wyoming attorney general;

Made payable to the department;

Guarantee payment of delinquent taxes, penalties and interest due under this article and the return of the license issued under this article;

Conditioned on the applicant not practicing any fraud, making any fraudulent representation or violating any law relating to the conduct of the business for which the applicant is licensed under this article.

Notwithstanding the waiver of a bond authorized under paragraph (i) of this subsection, the department may require a bond from any licensee whose license has been revoked or who violates any provision of this article. Any licensee who fails to file any report required under this article, remits insufficient funds or is delinquent in filing any two (2) times in a preceding twelve (12) month period shall be required to post a bond as provided in this subsection. Such bond may be waived by the department after a demonstration of a good filing record which is complete, accurate and timely by the licensee for a twelve (12) month period;

Failure to post the required bond or certificate of deposit under this subsection shall result in the denial of a license;

In lieu of a surety or cash bond the department may accept a certificate of deposit under the following requirements:

The certificate of deposit:

Shall be issued by a financial institution authorized to do business in Wyoming and qualified by law to act as a depository of public funds in this state;

Shall be payable not more than one (1) year after being deposited with the department.

The department shall be given a first priority security interest in the certificate of deposit. The certificate of deposit shall not be subject to attachment or execution unless the attachment or execution arises out of a suit for delinquent taxes, penalties and interest due under this article and the return of the license issued under this article. The entire amount of the certificate of deposit shall be forfeited to the state if the licensee practices any fraud, makes any fraudulent representation or violates any law relating to the conduct of the business for which he is licensed under this article;

The certificate of deposit and related documents providing for the security interest and forfeiture shall be approved as to form by the Wyoming attorney general;

The licensee shall pay all cost incurred by the department to perfect its security interest;

Any interest earned on a certificate of deposit shall accrue to the licensee.

No person shall operate a commercial vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-18-101(a)(iii) between Wyoming and other jurisdictions unless the person has a valid international fuel tax agreement license and decals pursuant to W.S.

31-18-502

or a temporary permit under W.S.

31-18-201

.

Each applicant for an international fuel tax agreement license and decals shall file an application in a form and manner prescribed by the department and pay the applicable fees for the license and a decal as prescribed by the department pursuant to W.S.

31-18-502

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 11, § 1; 2010, ch. 72, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “pursuant to W.S.

31-18-502

” in (f); in (g), substituted “the applicable fees” for “a fee of ten dollars ($10.00),” deleted “fee” following “decal,” and inserted “pursuant to W.S.

31-18-502

.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (e), inserted “or accept in lieu of a bond a certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of paragraph (vi) of this subsection”; in (e)(v), inserted “or certificate of deposit”; added (e)(vi); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-203, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments by ch. 51 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Subsections (f) and (g) of this section were originally designated as subsections (a) and (b), respectively, of W.S. 39-6-217, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 1998, and were subsequently redesignated by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office, pursuant to W.S.

8-1-105

.

Gasoline tax is a license tax.

It is in no manner a sales or use tax on retail sales. County of Natrona v. Casper Air Serv., 536 P.2d 142,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1975).